Washington statutes.
RCW 43.46.070

Biennial report.

The commission shall make a biennial report of its proceedings and recommendations to the governor, which shall contain a full description of program and project activity, including fund sources and expenditures for the biennium covered by the report.

[ 1985 c 317 s 8; 1965 c 8 s 43.46.070. Prior: 1961 c 301 s 7.]